Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.140

Renewals.

The secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for renewal of a credential. Failure to renew shall invalidate the credential and all privileges granted by the credential. If a license or certificate has lapsed for a period longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the secretary by taking continuing education courses, or meeting other standards determined by the secretary.

[ 1991 c 3 s 267; 1987 c 150 s 74.]